Louisiana, session 2026, HB1082.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 84 is hereby amended and reenacted and
Code of Civil Procedure Article 84.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 84. Action involving certain retirement systems and employee benefit programs
Actions involving the Louisiana State Employees' Retirement System, Office
of Group Benefits, State Police Pension and Relief Fund, Louisiana School
Employees' Retirement System, Louisiana School Lunch Employees' Retirement
System, Teachers' Retirement System of Louisiana, Assessors' Retirement Fund,
Clerks of Court Retirement and Relief Fund, District Attorneys' Retirement System,
Municipal Employees' Retirement System of Louisiana, Parochial Employees'
Retirement System of Louisiana, Registrar of Voters Employees' Retirement System,
Sheriffs' Pension and Relief Fund, Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System,
or the Firefighters' Retirement System shall be brought in the parish of East Baton
Rouge or in the parish of the domicile of the retirement system or employee benefit
program.
Art. 84.1. Actions involving the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System
A. If the defendant is the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System
or its board of trustees, the action shall be brought in the parish of East Baton Rouge
or in the parish of the domicile of the retirement system or employee benefit
program.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1082 ENROLLED
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if the Municipal
Police Employees' Retirement System or its board of trustees is the plaintiff, the
action shall be brought only in the district court having jurisdiction in the parish in
which the cause of action arises.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.